Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1774.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3003.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 3003.1. Petitions for Refunds.--* * *(a.1) If a taxpayer petitions the Department of Revenue for a refund or credit under subsection (a) more than three years after the actual payment of the tax, interest or penalty, the Department of Revenue may review each case of overpayment and 123456789101112131415161718192021 grant a refund or credit to the taxpayer for the number of years of overpayment as the department deems necessary.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1774PN2182 - 2 - 1234